District of Columbia statutes.
19-1304.10

Modification or termination of trust; proceedings for approval or disapproval.

(a)

In addition to the methods of termination prescribed by section 19-1304.11 through section 19-1304.14, a trust terminates to the extent the trust is revoked or expires pursuant to its terms, no purpose of the trust remains to be achieved, or the purposes of the trust have become unlawful, contrary to public policy, or impossible to achieve.

(b)

A proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under sections 19-1304.11 through 19-1304.16, or trust combination or division under section 19-1304.17, may be commenced by a trustee or beneficiary, and a proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under section 19-1304.11 may be commenced by the settlor. The settlor of a charitable trust may maintain a proceeding to modify the trust under section 19-1304.13.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-1301.05.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 410 of the Uniform Trust Code.